District of Columbia statutes.
50-921.12

Special purpose revenue funds.

(a)

Beginning October 1, 2011, the Mayor shall submit to the Council, on a quarterly basis, a report certified by the Chief Financial Officer of the District of Columbia that details the activities, budget, expenditures, and variances, at the program level, of all programs, activities, and projects undertaken by the District Department of Transportation from all available special purpose revenue funding sources.

(b)

The Chief Financial Officer of the District of Columbia shall certify that project expenditures and obligations have not exceeded authorized amounts and that fund revenues are sufficient to ensure that remaining authorized project expenditures will not exceed revenues.

May 21, 2002, D.C. Law 14-137, § 9d
as added Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-370, § 626(c), 58 DCR 1008
Section 629 of D.C. Law 18-370 provided: “Sec. 629. Applicability. This subtitle shall apply as of October 1, 2011; except, that sections 622 and 623(a)(2) shall apply as of the effective date of this act.”